Florida, session 2026, SB1512.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 20 21 Section 1.âSubsection (6) of section 196.012, Florida 22 Statutes, is amended to read: 23 196.012âDefinitions.âFor the purpose of this chapter, the 24 following terms are defined as follows, except where the context 25 clearly indicates otherwise: 26 (6)âGovernmental, municipal, or public purpose or function 27 is shall be deemed to be served or performed when the lessee 28 under any leasehold interest created in property of the United 29 States, the state or any of its political subdivisions, or any 30 municipality, agency, special district, authority, or other 31 public body corporate of the state is demonstrated to perform a 32 function or serve a governmental purpose which could properly be 33 performed or served by an appropriate governmental unit or which 34 is demonstrated to perform a function or serve a purpose which 35 would otherwise be a valid subject for the allocation of public 36 funds. For purposes of the preceding sentence, an activity 37 undertaken by a lessee which is permitted under the terms of its 38 lease of real property designated as an aviation area on an 39 airport layout plan which has been approved by the Federal 40 Aviation Administration and which real property is used for the 41 administration, operation, business offices and activities 42 related specifically thereto in connection with the conduct of 43 an aircraft full service fixed base operation which provides 44 goods and services to the general aviation public in the 45 promotion of air commerce is shall be deemed an activity which 46 serves a governmental, municipal, or public purpose or function. 47 Any activity undertaken by a lessee which is permitted under the 48 terms of its lease of real property designated as a public 49 airport as defined in s. 332.004(14) by municipalities, 50 agencies, special districts, authorities, or other public bodies 51 corporate and public bodies politic of the state, a spaceport as 52 defined in s. 331.303, or which is located in a deepwater port 53 identified in s. 403.021(9)(b) and owned by one of the foregoing 54 governmental units, subject to a leasehold or other possessory 55 interest of a nongovernmental lessee that is deemed to perform 56 an aviation, airport, aerospace, maritime, or port purpose or 57 operation shall be deemed an activity that serves a 58 governmental, municipal, or public purpose. The use by a lessee, 59 licensee, or management company of real property or a portion 60 thereof as a convention center, visitor center, sports facility 61 with permanent seating, concert hall, arena, stadium, park, or 62 beach is deemed a use that serves a governmental, municipal, or 63 public purpose or function when access to the property is open 64 to the general public with or without a charge for admission. If 65 property deeded to a municipality by the United States is 66 subject to a requirement that the Federal Government must, 67 through a schedule established by the Secretary of the Interior, 68 determine that the property is being maintained for public 69 historic preservation, park, or recreational purposes and that 70 if those conditions are not met, the property will revert back 71 to the Federal Government, then such property is shall be deemed 72 to serve a municipal or public purpose. The term âgovernmental 73 purposeâ also includes a direct use of property on federal lands 74 in connection with the Federal Governmentâs Space Exploration 75 Program, aerospace activities as specified in s. 331.303, or 76 spaceport activities as defined in s. 212.02(22). Real property 77 and tangible personal property owned by the Federal Government 78 or Space Florida and used for defense and space exploration 79 purposes or which is put to a use in support thereof is shall be 80 deemed to perform an essential national governmental purpose and 81 is shall be exempt. Real property and tangible personal property 82 being used by a nongovernmental lessee within this state 83 pursuant to a project authorized by the Space Florida board of 84 directors is deemed to perform an essential governmental purpose 85 and is exempt. As used in this chapter, the term âowned by the 86 lesseeâ as used in this chapter does not include personal 87 property, buildings, or other real property improvements used 88 for the administration, operation, business offices and 89 activities related specifically thereto in connection with the 90 conduct of an aircraft full service fixed based operation which 91 provides goods and services to the general aviation public in 92 the promotion of air commerce provided that the real property is 93 designated as an aviation area on an airport layout plan 94 approved by the Federal Aviation Administration. For purposes of 95 determination of âownership,â buildings and other real property 96 improvements which will revert to the airport authority or other 97 governmental unit upon expiration of the term of the lease are 98 shall be deemed âownedâ by the governmental unit and not the 99 lessee. Also, for purposes of determination of ownership under 100 this section or s. 196.199(5), flight simulation training 101 devices qualified by the Federal Aviation Administration, and 102 the equipment and software necessary for the operation of such 103 devices, are shall be deemed âownedâ by a governmental unit and 104 not the lessee if such devices will revert to that governmental 105 unit upon the expiration of the term of the lease, provided the 106 governing body of the governmental unit has approved the lease 107 in writing. Providing two-way telecommunications services to the 108 public for hire by the use of a telecommunications facility, as 109 defined in s. 364.02(14), and for which a certificate is 110 required under chapter 364 does not constitute an exempt use for 111 purposes of s. 196.199, unless the telecommunications services 112 are provided by the operator of a public-use airport, as defined 113 in s. 332.004, for the operatorâs provision of 114 telecommunications services for the airport or its tenants, 115 concessionaires, or licensees, or unless the telecommunications 116 services are provided by a public hospital. 117 Section 2.âParagraph (j) of subsection (5) of section 118 212.08, Florida Statutes, is reordered and amended to read: 119 212.08âSales, rental, use, consumption, distribution, and 120 storage tax; specified exemptions.âThe sale at retail, the 121 rental, the use, the consumption, the distribution, and the 122 storage to be used or consumed in this state of the following 123 are hereby specifically exempt from the tax imposed by this 124 chapter. 125 (5)âEXEMPTIONS; ACCOUNT OF USE.â 126 (j)âMachinery and equipment used in semiconductor, defense, 127 or space technology production.â 128 1.âAll of the following are exempt from the tax imposed by 129 this chapter: 130 a.âIndustrial machinery and equipment used in semiconductor 131 technology facilities certified under subparagraph 5. to 132 manufacture, process, compound, or produce semiconductor 133 technology products for sale or for use by these facilities are 134 exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter. For purposes of 135 this paragraph, industrial machinery and equipment includes 136 molds, dies, machine tooling, other appurtenances or accessories 137 to machinery and equipment, testing equipment, test beds, 138 computers, and software, whether purchased or self-fabricated, 139 and, if self-fabricated, includes materials and labor for 140 design, fabrication, and assembly. 141 b.âIndustrial machinery and equipment used in defense or 142 space technology facilities certified under subparagraph 5. to 143 design, manufacture, assemble, process, compound, or produce 144 defense technology products or space technology products for 145 sale or for use by these facilities are exempt from the tax 146 imposed by this chapter. 147 c.(I)âTangible personal property, including, but not 148 limited to, machinery or equipment, leased to a private entity 149 lessee that: 150 (A)âIs owned by a federal, state, or local governmental 151 entity; 152 (B)âIs located in this state; 153 (C)âIs used by the lessee solely in connection with 154 semiconductor, defense, or aerospace contracts, programs, or 155 projects; and 156 (D)âIs leased under a written lease, license, or similar 157 agreement with the federal, state, or local governmental entity 158 that owns the machinery or equipment. 159 (II)âThe department may adopt rules governing the manner 160 and form of the application for, and the issuance of, exemption 161 certificates pursuant to this sub-subparagraph. 162 2.âBuilding materials purchased for use in manufacturing or 163 expanding clean rooms in semiconductor-manufacturing facilities 164 are exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter. 165 3.âIn addition to meeting the criteria mandated by 166 subparagraph 1. or subparagraph 2., a business must be certified 167 by the Department of Commerce in order to qualify for exemption 168 under this paragraph. 169 4.âFor items purchased tax-exempt pursuant to this 170 paragraph, possession of a written certification from the 171 purchaser, certifying the purchaserâs entitlement to the 172 exemption, relieves the seller of the responsibility of 173 collecting the tax on the sale of such items, and the department 174 shall look solely to the purchaser for recovery of the tax if it 175 determines that the purchaser was not entitled to the exemption. 176 5.a.âTo be eligible to receive the exemption provided by 177 subparagraph 1. or subparagraph 2., a qualifying business entity 178 shall initially apply to the Department of Commerce. The 179 original certification is valid for a period of 2 years. In lieu 180 of submitting a new application, the original certification may 181 be renewed biennially by submitting to the Department of 182 Commerce a statement, certified under oath, that there has not 183 been a material change in the conditions or circumstances 184 entitling the business entity to the original certification. The 185 initial application and the certification renewal statement 186 shall be developed by the Department of Commerce. 187 b.âThe Division of Economic Development of the Department 188 of Commerce shall review each submitted initial application and 189 determine whether or not the application is complete within 5 190 working days. Once complete, the division shall, within 10 191 working days, evaluate the application and recommend approval or 192 disapproval to the Department of Commerce. 193 c.âUpon receipt of the initial application and 194 recommendation from the division or upon receipt of a 195 certification renewal statement, the Department of Commerce 196 shall certify within 5 working days those applicants who are 197 found to meet the requirements of this section and notify the 198 applicant of the original certification or certification 199 renewal. If the Department of Commerce finds that the applicant 200 does not meet the requirements, it shall notify the applicant 201 within 10 working days that the application for certification 202 has been denied and the reasons for denial. The Department of 203 Commerce has final approval authority for certification under 204 this section. 205 d.âThe initial application and certification renewal 206 statement must indicate, for program evaluation purposes only, 207 the average number of full-time equivalent employees at the 208 facility over the preceding calendar year, the average wage and 209 benefits paid to those employees over the preceding calendar 210 year, the total investment made in real and tangible personal 211 property over the preceding calendar year, and the total value 212 of tax-exempt purchases and taxes exempted during the previous 213 year. The department shall assist the Department of Commerce in 214 evaluating and verifying information provided in the application 215 for exemption. 216 e.âThe Department of Commerce may use the information 217 reported on the initial application and certification renewal 218 statement for evaluation purposes only. 219 6.âA business certified to receive this exemption may elect 220 to designate one or more state universities or community 221 colleges as recipients of up to 100 percent of the amount of the 222 exemption. To receive these funds, the institution must agree to 223 match the funds with equivalent cash, programs, services, or 224 other in-kind support on a one-to-one basis for research and 225 development projects requested by the certified business. The 226 rights to any patents, royalties, or real or intellectual 227 property must be vested in the business unless otherwise agreed 228 to by the business and the university or community college. 229 7.âAs used in this paragraph, the term: 230 c.a.ââSemiconductor technology productsâ means raw 231 semiconductor wafers or semiconductor thin films that are 232 transformed into semiconductor memory or logic wafers, including 233 wafers containing mixed memory and logic circuits; related 234 assembly and test operations; active-matrix flat panel displays; 235 semiconductor chips; semiconductor lasers; optoelectronic 236 elements; and related semiconductor technology products as 237 determined by the Department of Commerce. 238 a.b.ââClean roomsâ means manufacturing facilities enclosed 239 in a manner that meets the clean manufacturing requirements 240 necessary for high-technology semiconductor-manufacturing 241 environments. 242 b.c.ââDefense technology productsâ means products that have 243 a military application, including, but not limited to, weapons, 244 weapons systems, guidance systems, surveillance systems, 245 communications or information systems, munitions, aircraft, 246 vessels, or boats, or components thereof, which are intended for 247 military use and manufactured in performance of a contract with 248 the United States Department of Defense or the military branch 249 of a recognized foreign government or a subcontract thereunder 250 which relates to matters of national defense. 251 d.ââSpace technology productsâ means products that are 252 specifically designed or manufactured for application in space 253 activities, including, but not limited to, space launch 254 vehicles, space flight vehicles, missiles, satellites or 255 research payloads, avionics, and associated control systems and 256 processing systems and components of any of the foregoing. The 257 term does not include products that are designed or manufactured 258 for general commercial aviation or other uses even though those 259 products may also serve an incidental use in space applications. 260 Section 3.âSubsection (4) of section 331.302, Florida 261 Statutes, is amended to read: 262 331.302âSpace Florida; creation; purpose.â 263 (4)(a)âSpace Florida is not an agency as defined in ss. 264 216.011 and 287.012. 265 (b)âSpace Florida is not subject to s. 255.20 when 266 purchasing professional or construction services, or both, using 267 funds that are not appropriated by the Legislature. For all such 268 purchases, Space Florida shall maintain in its records an 269 attestation that the funds used are not appropriated by the 270 Legislature. 271 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.